Nebraska, session 109, LB707A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $164,210 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $50,800 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 707, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $37,000 for FY2025-26 or
$38,200 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-